Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2953.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-1 of the General Laws entitled "Causes of Action" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-1-27.4. Family court mediators - Immunity from liability.
The state shall protect and hold harmless mediators and other staff of the family court
mediation program from financial loss and expense, including legal fees and costs, if any, arising
out of any claim, demand, or suit for damages resulting from acts or omissions committed in the
discharge of their duties with the program and within the scope of their employment which may
constitute negligence, but which acts are not wanton, malicious, or grossly negligent as determined
by a court of competent jurisdiction.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005280
========